Maryland, session 2026, HB0633.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–864.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0633*

HOUSE BILL 633
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(1) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS
ON AN EXPENSE–INCURRED BASIS UNDER HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES THAT ARE
ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND
(2) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS UNDER
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.
(B) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SHALL PROVIDE AN INDIVIDUAL
WITH COVERAGE FOR OPPORTUNISTIC SALPINGECTOMY COVERAGE FOR OVARIAN
CANCER PREVENTION.
(C) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY NOT IMPOSE A COPAYMENT,
COINSURANCE, OR DEDUCTIBLE REQUIREMENT ON SALPINGECTOMY COVERAGE
FOR OVARIAN CANCER PREVENTION.
(2) IF AN INSURED OR ENROLLEE IS COVERED UNDER A
HIGH–DEDUCTIBLE HEALTH PLAN, AS DEFINED IN 26 U.S.C. § 223, AN ENTITY
SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY SUBJECT SALPINGECTOMY COVERAGE FOR
OVARIAN CANCER PREVENTION TO THE DEDUCTIBLE REQUIREMENT OF THE
HIGH–DEDUCTIBLE PLAN.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 1 of this Act shall
apply to all policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the
State on or after January 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 1,
2026, the Maryland Health Care Commission shall:
(1) conduct a mandated benefits study of coverage of salpingectomy that is
not opportunistic for individuals who are not at high risk of ovarian cancer, including
consideration of existing practice guidance issued by the American College of Obstetricians
and Gynecologists and the Society of Gynecologic Oncology as well as the differences in
efficacy of nonopportunistic salpingectomy versus the efficacy of opportunistic
salpingectomy for individuals who are not at high risk; and
(2) report the findings of the study to the Senate Finance Committee and
the House Health Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.

HOUSE BILL 633 3
SECTION 3. 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Sections 1 and 2 this Act
shall take effect January 1, 2027.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in
Section 4 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.